test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-marangy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - мараӈга: # Noun 'cloudberry' - partial paradigm /Type 14/
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom: мараӈга
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc: мараӈгамʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen: мараӈгаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat: мараӈганʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc: мараӈгахана
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl: мараӈгахад
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros: мараӈгавна
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom: мараӈгаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc: мараӈгы
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen: мараӈгыˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat: мараӈгахаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc: мараӈгахаˮна
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl: мараӈгахат
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros: мараӈгыˮмана    

     мараӈга+N+Tra: мараӈгаӈэ
     мараӈга+N+Car: мараӈгасиˮ
     мараӈга+N+Equ: мараӈгадремʼ
     мараӈга+N+Equ+Lat: мараӈгадревʼ
     
# Possessive forms 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мараӈгав 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгар  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгада 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгамиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгариʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгадиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгараˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгадоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [мараӈгав, мараӈгами] 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгамд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгамда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгамиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгаваˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгамдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгамдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [мараӈган, мараӈгани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈганд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈганда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈганиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈганаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [мараӈгахан, мараӈгахани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мараӈгаханд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мараӈгаханда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: мараӈгаханиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: мараӈгахандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: мараӈгахандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мараӈгаханаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мараӈгахандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мараӈгахандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: мараӈгаханан   
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: мараӈгаханани  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: мараӈгахананд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: мараӈгахананда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: мараӈгахананиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: мараӈгаханандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: мараӈгаханандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: мараӈгахананаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: мараӈгаханандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: мараӈгаханандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: мараӈгахадан   
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: мараӈгахадани  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: мараӈгахаданд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: мараӈгахаданда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: мараӈгахаданиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: мараӈгахадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: мараӈгахадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: мараӈгахаданаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: мараӈгахадандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: мараӈгахадандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: мараӈгавнан   
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: мараӈгавнани  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мараӈгавнанд  
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мараӈгавнанда 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мараӈгавнаниʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мараӈгавнандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мараӈгавнандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мараӈгавнанаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мараӈгавнандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мараӈгавнандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: мараӈгахаюн  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгахаюд  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюда 
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгахаюдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгахаюдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: мараӈгахаюн  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгахаюд  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюда 
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгахаюдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгахаюдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: мараӈгахаюн  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгахают  
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюта 
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгахаютиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгахаютиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгахаютаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгахаютоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мараӈгын   
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгыд   
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгыда  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгыниʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгыдиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгыдиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгынаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгыдаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгыдоʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мараӈгын   
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгыд   
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгыда  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгыниʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгыдиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгыдиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгынаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгыдаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгыдоʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мараӈгыˮн  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгыт   
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгыта  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈгыˮниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгытиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгытиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈгыˮнаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгытаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгытоʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мараӈгахаˮн 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: мараӈгахат 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: мараӈгахата 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: мараӈгахаˮниʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: мараӈгахатиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: мараӈгахатиʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: мараӈгахаˮнаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: мараӈгахатаˮ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: мараӈгахатоʼ 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: мараӈгахаˮнан  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: мараӈгахаˮнат  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: мараӈгахаˮната 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: мараӈгахаˮнаниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: мараӈгахаˮнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: мараӈгахаˮнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: мараӈгахаˮнанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: мараӈгахаˮнатаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: мараӈгахаˮнатоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: мараӈгахатан 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: мараӈгахатат 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: мараӈгахатата 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: мараӈгахатаниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: мараӈгахататиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: мараӈгахататиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: мараӈгахатанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: мараӈгахататаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: мараӈгахататоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: мараӈгыˮмнан  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: мараӈгыˮмнат  
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: мараӈгыˮмната 
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: мараӈгыˮмнаниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: мараӈгыˮмнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: мараӈгыˮмнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: мараӈгыˮмнанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: мараӈгыˮмнатаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: мараӈгыˮмнатоʼ

# Predestinative
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Abs: мараӈгад
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: мараӈгадав 
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгадар  
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгадада
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: мараӈгадав
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгадамд
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгадамда
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: мараӈгадан
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгаданд
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгаданда
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгадамиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгадариʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгададиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгадамиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгадамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгадамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈгаданиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгадаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгадараˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгададоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгадаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгадамдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгадамдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈгаданаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгадандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгадандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)
